Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-480
Districts; changes in boundaries; filing of petition; evidence.

The county clerk shall file in his or her office all petitions that have been granted for change of boundaries or for the formation of new districts. Such petitions so filed and granted shall be prima facie evidence of the boundaries of districts. All conflicting records of boundaries shall be made to correspond with the petitions so filed and granted.

Laws 1885, c. 79, § 1, p. 319;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 1, p. 539;

Laws 1895, c. 58, § 1, p. 221;

Laws 1901, c. 59, § 1, p. 429;

Laws 1909, c. 117, § 1, p. 451;

R.S.1913, § 6703;

C.S.1922, § 6241;

Laws 1923, c. 63, § 1, p. 190;

Laws 1925, c. 177, § 1, p. 461;

C.S.1929, § 79-104;

Laws 1931, c. 145, § 1, p. 396;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-104;

Laws 1943, c. 197, § 1(8), p. 664;

R.S.1943, § 79-117;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 48, p. 709;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-409;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 229;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 63.